Utah statutes.
47-3-1.   Definition.
As used in this chapter, "shooting range" or "range" means an area designed
and continuously operated under nationally recognized standards and operating
practices for the use of rifles, shotguns, pistols, silhouettes, skeet, trap,
black powder, archery, or any other similar shooting activities.
